Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Probation and Parole Law
§ 47-7-38.
Graduated sanctions
as alternative to judicial modification or revocation of parole, probation
or post-release supervision.

The departmentshall have the authority to impose graduated sanctions as an alternativeto judicial modification or revocation, as provided in Sections 47-7-27 and 47-7-37, for offenders onprobation, parole, or post-release supervision who commit technicalviolations of the conditions of supervision as defined by Section 47-7-2.

The commissionershall develop a standardized graduated sanctions system, which shallinclude a grid to guide field officers in determining the suitableresponse to a technical violation. The commissioner shall promulgaterules and regulations for the development and application of the systemof sanctions. Field officers shall be required to conform to the sanctiongrid developed.

The system ofsanctions shall include a list of sanctions for the most common typesof violations. When determining the sanction to impose, the fieldofficer shall take into account the offender’s assessed risklevel, previous violations and sanctions, and severity of the currentand prior violations.

Field officersshall notify the sentencing court when a probationer has committeda technical violation or the parole board when a parolee has committeda technical violation of the type of violation and the sanction imposed.When the technical violation is an arrest for a new criminal offense,the field officer shall notify the court within forty-eight (48) hoursof becoming aware of the arrest.

The graduatedsanctions that the department may impose include, but shall not belimited to:

Verbal warnings;

Increased reporting;

Increased drugand alcohol testing;

Mandatory substanceabuse treatment;

Loss of earned-dischargecredits; and

Incarcerationin a county jail for no more than two (2) days. Incarceration as asanction shall not be used more than two (2) times per month for atotal period incarcerated of no more than four (4) days.

The system shallalso define positive reinforcements that offenders will receive forcompliance with conditions of supervision. These positive reinforcementsshall include, but not limited to:

Verbal recognition;

Reduced reporting;and

Credits for earneddischarge which shall be awarded pursuant to Section 47-7-40.

The Departmentof Corrections shall provide semiannually to the Oversight Task Forcethe number and percentage of offenders who have one or more violationsduring the year, the average number of violations per offender duringthe year and the total and average number of incarceration sanctionsas defined in subsection (5) of this section imposed during the year.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 54, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-7-38.1.
Technical violation
centers.

The Departmentof Corrections shall establish technical violation centers to detainprobation and parole violators revoked by the court or parole board.

The departmentshall place an offender in a violation center for a technical violationas ordered by the board pursuant to Section 47-7-27 and the sentencingcourt pursuant to Section 47-7-37.

The violationcenters shall be equipped to address the underlying factors that ledto the offender’s violation as identified based on the resultsof a risk and needs assessment. At a minimum each violation centershall include substance abuse services shown to reduce recidivismand a reduction in the use of illicit substances or alcohol, educationprograms, employment preparation and training programs and behavioralprograms.

As required by Section 47-5-20(b), the departmentshall notify, by certified mail, each member of the board of supervisorsof the county in which the violation center shall be located of thedepartment’s intent to convert an existing department facilityto a technical violation center.

The departmentshall establish rules and regulations for the implementation and operationof the technical violation centers.

The Departmentof Corrections shall provide to the Oversight Task Force semiannuallythe average daily population of the technical violation centers, thenumber of admissions to the technical violation centers, and the averagetime served in the technical violation centers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 61, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-7-39.
Change of residence;
transfer.

If, for goodand sufficient reasons, a probationer desires to change his residencewithin or without the state, such transfer may be effected by applicationto his field supervisor which transfer shall be subject to the court’sconsent and subject to such regulations as the court, or judge, mayrequire.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-26; Laws, 1956, ch. 262, § 13; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 89; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 109; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 119; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 119, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-7-40.
Earned-discharge
program; eligibility; accrual of earned-discharge credits.

The commissioner shall establish rules and regulations for implementing the earned-discharge program that allows offenders on probation and parole to reduce the period of supervision for complying with conditions of probation. The department shall have the authority to award earned-discharge credits to all offenders placed on probation, parole, or post-release supervision who are in compliance with the terms and conditions of supervision. An offender serving a Mississippi sentence for an eligible offense in any jurisdiction under the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision shall be eligible for earned-discharge credits under this section. Offenders shall not be denied earned-discharge credits solely based on nonpayment of fees or fines if a hardship waiver has been granted as provided in Section 47-7-49.

For each full calendar month of compliance with the conditions of supervision, earned-discharge credits equal to the number of days in that month shall be deducted from the offender’s sentence discharge date. Credits begin to accrue for eligible offenders after the first full calendar month of compliance supervision conditions. For the purposes of this section, an offender is deemed to be in compliance with the conditions of supervision if there was no violation of the conditions of supervision.

No earned-discharge credits may accrue for a calendar month in which a violation report has been submitted, the offender has absconded from supervision, the offender is serving a term of imprisonment in a technical violation center, or for the months between the submission of the violation report and the final action on the violation report by the court or the board.

Earned-discharge credits shall be applied to the sentence within thirty (30) days of the end of the month in which the credits were earned. At least every six (6) months, an offender who is serving a sentence eligible for earned-discharge credits shall be notified of the current sentence discharge date.

Once the combination of time served on probation, parole or post-release supervision, and earned-discharge credits satisfy the term of probation, parole, or post-release supervision, the board or sentencing court shall order final discharge of the offender. No less than sixty (60) days prior to the date of final discharge, the department shall notify the sentencing court and the board of the impending discharge.

The department shall provide semiannually to the Oversight Task Force the number and percentage of offenders who qualify for earned discharge in one or more months of the year and the average amount of credits earned within the year.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 55, eff from and after July 1, 2014; Laws, 2019, ch. 466, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 47-7-41.
Discharge from
probation.

When a probationershall be discharged from probation by the court of original jurisdiction,the field supervisor, upon receiving a written request from the probationer,shall forward a written report of the record of the probationer tothe Division of Community Corrections of the department, which shallpresent a copy of this report to the Governor. The Governor may, inhis discretion, at any time thereafter by appropriate executive orderrestore any civil rights lost by the probationer by virtue of hisconviction or plea of guilty in the court of original jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-27; Laws, 1956, ch. 262, § 14; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 90; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 110; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 120; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 120; Laws, 1992, ch. 511, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 624, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 47-7-43.
Application of
provisions.

The provisionsof this chapter are hereby extended to all persons who, at the effectivedate thereof, may be on parole, or eligible to be placed on paroleunder existing laws, with the same force and effect as if this chapterhad been in operation at the time such persons were placed on paroleor become eligible to be placed thereon, as the case may be.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-17; Laws, 1950, ch. 524, § 18; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 111; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 121; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 121, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-7-45.
Provisions inapplicable
to Oakley Youth Development Center.

The provisionsof this chapter shall not apply to probation under the Youth CourtLaw nor to parole from the Oakley Youth Development Center.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4004-18; Laws, 1950, ch. 524, § 19; Laws, 1956, ch. 262, § 8; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 112; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 122; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 122; Laws, 2010, ch. 554, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 47-7-47.
Earned probation
program; restitution to crime victim.

The judge ofany circuit court may place an offender on a program of earned probationafter a period of confinement as set out herein and the judge mayseek the advice of the commissioner and shall direct that the defendantbe under the supervision of the department.

Any circuit courtor county court may, upon its own motion, acting upon the advice andconsent of the commissioner not earlier than thirty (30) days norlater than one (1) year after the defendant has been delivered tothe custody of the department, to which he has been sentenced, suspendthe further execution of the sentence and place the defendant on earnedprobation, except when a death sentence or life imprisonment is themaximum penalty which may be imposed or if the defendant has beenconfined two (2) or more times for the conviction of a felony on aprevious occasion in any court or courts of the United States andof any state or territories thereof or has been convicted of a felonyinvolving the use of a deadly weapon.

The authoritygranted in this subsection shall be exercised by the judge who imposedsentence on the defendant, or his successor.

The time limitimposed by paragraph (a) of this subsection is not applicable to thosedefendants sentenced to the custody of the department prior to April14, 1977. Persons who are convicted of crimes that carry mandatorysentences shall not be eligible for earned probation.

When any circuitor county court places an offender on earned probation, the courtshall give notice to the Mississippi Department of Corrections withinfifteen (15) days of the court’s decision to place the offenderon earned probation. Notice shall be delivered to the central officeof the Mississippi Department of Corrections and to the regional officeof the department which will be providing supervision to the offenderon earned probation.

If the courtplaces any person on probation or earned probation, the court mayorder the person, as a condition of probation, to a period of confinementand treatment at a private or public agency or institution, eitherwithin or without the state, which treats emotional, mental or drug-relatedproblems. Any person who, as a condition of probation, is confinedfor treatment at an out-of-state facility shall be supervised pursuantto Section 47-7-71, and anyperson confined at a private agency shall not be confined at publicexpense. Time served in any such agency or institution may be countedas time required to meet the criteria of subsection (2)(a).

If the courtplaces any person on probation or earned probation, the court mayorder the person to make appropriate restitution to any victim ofhis crime or to society through the performance of reasonable workfor the benefit of the community.

If the courtplaces any person on probation or earned probation, the court mayorder the person, as a condition of probation, to submit, as providedin Section 47-5-601, to anytype of breath, saliva or urine chemical analysis test, the purposeof which is to detect the possible presence of alcohol or a substanceprohibited or controlled by any law of the State of Mississippi orthe United States.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 479, § 5; Laws, 1978, ch. 400, § 10; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 113; Laws, 1981, ch. 502, § 12; Laws, 1983, ch. 435, § 7; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 123; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 123; Laws, 1996, ch. 397, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 622, § 3; Laws, 2001, ch. 482, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 47-7-49.
Creation of community service
revolving fund; payments by offender on probation, parole, earned-release
supervision, post-release supervision, or earned probation; disposition
of payments; time limit on payments [Repealed effective June 30, 2022].

Any offender on probation, parole, earned-release supervision, post-release supervision, earned probation or any other offender under the field supervision of the Community Services Division of the department shall pay to the department the sum of Fifty-five Dollars ($55.00) per month by certified check or money order unless a hardship waiver is granted. An offender shall make the initial payment within sixty (60) days after being released from imprisonment unless a hardship waiver is granted. A hardship waiver may be granted by the sentencing court or the Department of Corrections. A hardship waiver may not be granted for a period of time exceeding ninety (90) days. The commissioner or his designee shall deposit Fifty Dollars ($50.00) of each payment received into a special fund in the State Treasury, which is hereby created, to be known as the Community Service Revolving Fund. Expenditures from this fund shall be made for: (a) the establishment of restitution and satellite centers; and (b) the establishment, administration and operation of the department’s Drug Identification Program and the intensive and field supervision program. The Fifty Dollars ($50.00) may be used for salaries and to purchase equipment, supplies and vehicles to be used by the Community Services Division in the performance of its duties. Expenditures for the purposes established in this section may be made from the fund upon requisition by the commissioner, or his designee.

Of the remaining amount, Three Dollars ($3.00) of each payment shall be deposited into the Crime Victims’ Compensation Fund created in Section 99-41-29, and Two Dollars ($2.00) shall be deposited into the Training Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 47-7-51. When a person is convicted of a felony in this state, in addition to any other sentence it may impose, the court may, in its discretion, order the offender to pay a state assessment not to exceed the greater of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or the maximum fine that may be imposed for the offense, into the Crime Victims’ Compensation Fund created pursuant to Section 99-41-29.

Any federal funds made available to the department for training or for training facilities, equipment or services shall be deposited into the Correctional Training Revolving Fund created in Section 47-7-51. The funds deposited in this account shall be used to support an expansion of the department’s training program to include the renovation of facilities for training purposes, purchase of equipment and contracting of training services with community colleges in the state.

No offender shall be required to make this payment for a period of time longer than ten (10) years.

The offender may be imprisoned until the payments are made if the offender is financially able to make the payments and the court in the county where the offender resides so finds, subject to the limitations hereinafter set out. The offender shall not be imprisoned if the offender is financially unable to make the payments and so states to the court in writing, under oath, and the court so finds.

This section shall stand repealed from and after June 30, 2022.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 462, §§ 1-3; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 114; Laws, 1981, ch. 543, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 431, § 5; Laws, 1983, ch. 435, § 8, ch. 545, § 4; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 124; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 124; Laws, 1986, ch. 426; Laws, 1990, ch. 509, § 16; Laws, 1991, ch. 408, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 335, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 317, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1995, ch. 538, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 596, § 12; Laws, 1995, ch. 621, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 376, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 379, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 474, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1997, ch. 366, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 463, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 541, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 572, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2002, ch. 448, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2002, ch. 624, § 8; Laws, 2003, ch. 412, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 444, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 372, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 381, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 328, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 404, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 385, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 328, § 1, eff from and after June 30, 2015; Laws, 2018, ch. 324, § 1, eff from and after June 30, 2018; Laws, 2018, ch. 407, § 1, eff from and after June 30, 2018; Laws, 2019, ch. 466, § 35, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 47-7-51.
Correctional Training
Revolving Fund.

There is herebycreated in the State Treasury a special fund, which shall be knownas the Correctional Training Revolving Fund. This fund shall be usedto develop and implement the comprehensive correction training programauthorized in Chapter 509, Laws of 1990. These funds may be used toconstruct and renovate training facilities, purchase training equipmentfor the hiring of instructors, and to pay operating expenses to accomplishand fulfill the purposes of the training program.

The Commissionerof Corrections shall establish guidelines for the use and accountabilityof such funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 509, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 47-7-53.
Department of Corrections
to assume duties, powers and responsibilities of Parole Board.

If the ParoleBoard is abolished, the Department of Corrections shall assume andexercise all the duties, powers and responsibilities of the StateParole Board. The Commissioner of Corrections may assign to the appropriateofficers and divisions any powers and duties deemed appropriate tocarry out the duties and powers of the Parole Board. Wherever theterms “State Parole Board” or “Parole Board”appear in any state law, they shall mean the Department of Corrections.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 25, § 4; Laws, 1995, ch. 596, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 569, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 14, 2004.).

§ 47-7-55.
Parole Commission;
creation; purpose; membership; compensation.

There is herebycreated a joint committee of the Senate and House of Representativesto be known as the Parole Commission, hereinafter referred to as the“commission.” The commission shall study and make recommendationsto the Legislature related to the abolition of parole, the completeand thorough classification of inmates prior to sentencing and sentencingstandards.

The commissionshall consist of the following members:

Three (3) membersof the House Judiciary “B” Committee and three (3) membersof the House Penitentiary Committee appointed by the Speaker.

Three (3) membersof the Senate Corrections Committee and three (3) members of the SenateJudiciary Committee appointed by the Lieutenant Governor.

The Chairmanof the Senate Corrections Committee and the Chairman of the HousePenitentiary Committee shall serve as co-chair of the commission.

The commissionshall submit its findings and recommendations to the Legislature nolater than January 2, 1996.

For attendingmeetings of the commission, members of the commission shall receiveper diem as provided by Section 25-3-69, and reimbursementof expenses as provided by Section 5-1-47. The membersof the commission shall obtain the approval of the Management Committeeof the House of Representatives and the Contingent Expense Committeeof the Senate for per diem and travel expense expenditures of thecommission. The members of the commission shall not receive per diemor expenses while the Legislature is in session. All expenses incurredby and on behalf of the commission shall be paid from the contingencyfunds of the Senate and the House of Representatives.

In conductingits activities pursuant to this section, the commission may elicitthe support of and participation by federal, state and local agenciesand interested associations, organizations and individuals. The commissionmay appoint an advisory committee whose members shall serve withoutcompensation. The advisory committee may consist of judges, prosecutingattorneys, defense attorneys, medical professionals, correctionalpersonnel and any other individual or groups that the commission desiresto place on the advisory committee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 25, § 7; Laws, 1995, ch. 596, § 13, eff from and after June 30, 1995.